apertium-tat.tat.twol
"Insert ы after final е in some verbs"
0:ы <=> .#. б: а: е:й _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! бае -> байый, байыйк
           .#. о: е:й _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! ое -> ойый, ойыйк
        .#. б: у: я:й _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! буя -> буйый, буйыйк
           .#. а: я:й _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! ая -> айый, айыйк


"Convert е to й in some verbs"
е:й <=> .#. б: а: _ 0:ы %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! бае -> байый, байыйк
           .#. о: _ 0:ы %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! ое -> ойый, ойыйк


"Convert я to й in some verbs"
я:й <=> .#. б: у: _ 0:ы %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! буя -> буйый, буйыйк
           .#. а: _ 0:ы %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! ая -> айый, айыйк
        .#. т: ө: _ %>: [ %{E%}:и | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! төя -> төйи, төйик
        .#. с: ө: _ %>: [ %{E%}:и | %{A%}: ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! сөя -> сөйи, сөйик
        except
            !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
            _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] ;
            !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!"Convert е to ю in some verbs"
!е:ю <=> .#. б: а: _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: | %{s%}:0 ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! бае -> байый, байыйк
!           .#. о: _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: | %{s%}:0 ] [ %{E%}: | %>: | .#. ] ; ! ое -> ойый, ойыйк
!
!        .#. б: а: _ %>: %{U%}: %>: %{s%}:0 %{I%}: %{n%}: ; ! бае -> байый, байыйк
!           .#. о: _ %>: %{U%}: %>: %{s%}:0 %{I%}: %{n%}: ; ! ое -> ойый, ойыйк

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


!"good epenthesis rule"
!0:i <=> c k _  [ \0:i | .#. ] ;
